Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6173YH (1) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2461 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 11.15 Efficient use of public funds 1 ââ reports. 2 The auditor of state shall annually update a list of 3 best practices for maximizing the efficient use of public 4 funds with innovative, practical, and common sense items 5 that do not require legislative action. The auditor of 6 state shall distribute these recommendations to all public 7 entities and request that the public entities report on which 8 recommendations are being followed. The auditor of state shall 9 prepare an annual report that includes and analyzes the reports 10 received from public entities. 11